District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.31

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“DC Circulator” means a local transit facility passenger bus service operated by the District of Columbia government that provides a network of fixed-route bus service solely within the District of Columbia.

(2)

“DC Circulator Fund” means the fund established by § 50-921.33.

(3)

“Department” means the District Department of Transportation.

(4)

“Ticket” means passes, tokens, or any other form of payment, including those sold in bulk for resale, that may be used in lieu of cash.

(5)

“WMATA” means the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority created pursuant to § 9-1107.01.

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11a
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-225, § 3(e), 53 DCR 10232

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(b) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-134, June 16, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5762).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(b) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-321, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2557).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(e) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-3, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1439).